Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the  Department of Education, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $35,000,000, for deposit into the  Summer Learning Grant Pro-
gram Fund established by  section 3, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled House Bill
2007), for the 2025 Summer Learning Program.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$12,000,000 is established for the biennium ending June 30,  2025, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses by the Department of Education from the Summer Learning Grant
Program Fund established by section 3, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled House  Bill
2007).
SECTION 3.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Department of Education, for the biennium beginning  July 1, 2025, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $47,000,000, for deposit into the  Summer Learning Grant Pro-
gram Fund established by  section 3, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled House Bill
2007), for the 2026 and 2027 Summer Learning Programs.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$70,000,000 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses by the Department of Education from the Summer Learning Grant
Program Fund established by section 3, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled House  Bill
2007).
SECTION 5.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled House Bill 5047 (HB 5047-A) Page 1
Passed by House April 9, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate April 17, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5047 (HB 5047-A) Page 2